Utah statutes.
76-7-314.   Violations of abortion laws -- Classifications.

(1)  A willful violation of Section 76-7-307, 76-7-308, 76-7-310, 76-7-310.5, 76-7-311, or 76-7-312 is a felony of the third degree.

(2)  A violation of Section 76-7-326 is a felony of the third degree.

(3)  A violation of Section 76-7-314.5 is a felony of the second degree.

(4)  A violation of any other provision of this part is a class A misdemeanor.



Amended by Chapter 13, 2010 General Session

